Nevada, session 83, AB159.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 33 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Hope Card Program, which is intended to provide to
an applicant who has been granted an extended order, upon
request, a Hope Card that provides proof of the granting of the
extended order, is hereby established. The Office of the Attorney
General shall, after consultation and in coordination with the
district courts and justice courts, develop and administer the Hope
Card Program.
2. The Hope Card Program must ensure than an applicant
who has been granted an extended order and who has requested a
Hope Card pursuant to NRS 33.020 is provided with the Hope
Card as soon as practicable, but not more than 10 business days
after the extended order is granted.
3. The Office of the Attorney General shall not charge any
fee for providing a Hope Card pursuant to this section.
4. A Hope Card that is provided to an applicant for an
extended order pursuant to this section:
(a) Is valid until the date on which the extended order expires;
(b) May be issued in the form of a tangible, wallet-sized card
or a digital card, or both;
(c) Must be in a format established by the Office of the
Attorney General that contains substantially the following
information:
(1) The name and date of birth of the applicant;
(2) Information relating to the extended order, including,
without limitation, the court that granted the extended order, the
case number, the date on which the extended order was granted
and the date on which the extended order expires;
(3) The date on which the Hope Card is issued and the date
on which the Hope Card expires; and
(4) Any other information that the Office of the Attorney
General deems appropriate, which may include, without
limitation:
(I) The name and description of each additional person
or animal protected by the extended order;
(II) The name and date of birth of the adverse party;
(III) A physical description of the adverse party,
including, without limitation, height, weight, hair color and eye
color;
(IV) A photograph of the adverse party, if available; and
-
*AB159_R1*

– 3 –
(V) The telephone number for the United States
National Domestic Violence Hotline.
5. A person who knowingly presents a fraudulent or expired
Hope Card to another person with the specific intent to falsely
represent that the person is protected by an extended order is
guilty of a misdemeanor.
Sec. 2. NRS 33.017 is hereby amended to read as follows:
33.017 As used in NRS 33.017 to 33.100, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. “Extended order” means an extended order for protection
against domestic violence.
2. “Temporary order” means a temporary order for protection
against domestic violence.
Sec. 3. NRS 33.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
33.020 1. If it appears to the satisfaction of the court from
specific facts shown by a verified application that an act of domestic
violence has occurred or there exists a threat of domestic violence,
the court may grant a temporary or extended order. A court shall
only consider whether the act of domestic violence or the threat
thereof satisfies the requirements of NRS 33.018 without
considering any other factor in its determination to grant the
temporary or extended order.
2. A temporary or extended order must not be granted to the
applicant or the adverse party unless the applicant or the adverse
party has requested the order and has filed a verified application that
an act of domestic violence has occurred or there exists a threat of
domestic violence. An applicant for an extended order shall
indicate in the application whether the applicant is requesting the
Office of the Attorney General to provide a Hope Card to the
applicant in accordance with the provisions of section 1 of this act
if the court grants the extended order. If the applicant reasonably
believes that disclosing his or her address and contact information in
the application would jeopardize his or her safety, the applicant may
decline to disclose his or her address and contact information in the
application. If the applicant declines to disclose his or her address
and contact information in the application, then such information:
(a) Must be disclosed to the court and, for criminal justice
purposes, to any other authorized agency of criminal justice to allow
the agency of criminal justice to carry out any duty required
pursuant to NRS 33.017 to 33.100, inclusive;
(b) Must be maintained in a separate, confidential, electronic
document or database which is not publicly accessible; and
(c) Must not be released, disclosed or made accessible to the
public, except as authorized by the court.
-
*AB159_R1*

– 4 –
3. The court may require the applicant or the adverse party, or
both, to appear before the court before determining whether to grant
the temporary or extended order.
4. A temporary order may be granted with or without notice to
the adverse party. An extended order may only be granted after
notice to the adverse party and a hearing on the application.
5. A hearing on an application for an extended order must be
held within 45 days after the date on which the application for the
extended order is filed. If the adverse party has not been served
pursuant to NRS 33.060 or 33.065 and fails to appear at the hearing,
the court may, upon a showing that law enforcement, after due
diligence, has been unable to serve the adverse party or that the
adverse party has sought to avoid service by concealment, set a date
for a second hearing which must be held within 90 days after the
date on which the first hearing was scheduled.
6. If the adverse party has not been served pursuant to NRS
33.060 or 33.065 and fails to appear on the date set for a second
hearing on an application for an extended order pursuant to
subsection 5, the court may, upon a showing that law enforcement,
after due diligence, has been unable to serve the adverse party or
that the adverse party has sought to avoid service by concealment,
set a date for a third hearing which must be held within 90 days after
the date on which the second hearing was scheduled.
7. The court shall rule upon an application for a temporary
order within 1 judicial day after it is filed.
8. If it appears to the satisfaction of the court from specific
facts communicated by electronic means to the court by an alleged
victim that an act of domestic violence has occurred and the alleged
perpetrator of the domestic violence has been arrested and is
presently in custody pursuant to NRS 171.137, the court may grant a
temporary order. Before approving an order under such
circumstances, the court shall confirm with the appropriate law
enforcement agency that the applicant is an alleged victim and that
the alleged perpetrator is in custody. Upon approval by the court, the
signed order may be transmitted to the facility where the alleged
perpetrator is in custody by electronic or telephonic transmission to
a facsimile machine. If such an order is received by the facility
holding the alleged perpetrator while the alleged perpetrator is still
in custody, the order must be personally served by an authorized
employee of the facility before the alleged perpetrator is released.
The court shall mail a copy of each order issued pursuant to this
subsection to the alleged victim named in the order and cause the
original order to be filed with the court clerk on the first judicial day
after it is issued.
-
*AB159_R1*

– 5 –
9. In a county whose population is 52,000 or more, the court
shall be available 24 hours a day, 7 days a week, including
nonjudicial days and holidays, to receive electronic communications
and for the issuance of a temporary order pursuant to subsection 8.
10. In a county whose population is less than 52,000, the court
may be available 24 hours a day, 7 days a week, including
nonjudicial days and holidays, to receive electronic communications
and for the issuance of a temporary order pursuant to subsection 8.
11. The clerk of the court shall inform the protected party upon
the successful transfer of information concerning the registration to
the Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History as
required pursuant to NRS 33.095.
12. As used in this section, “agency of criminal justice” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 179A.030.
Sec. 4. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1, 2 and 3 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of developing the
Hope Card Program established pursuant to section 1 of this act and
performing any other preparatory administrative tasks that are
necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB159_R1*